Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-2352] University of Hawaii workers'
compensation and unemployment insurance compensation trust fund. There is
established the University of Hawaii workers' compensation and unemployment
insurance compensation trust fund into which shall be deposited all revenues
derived from assessments for workers' compensation costs and unemployment
insurance compensation costs against the payroll of university employees.
Revenues deposited into this account may be expended by the university for all
costs and expenses associated with the administration of the university's
workers' compensation and unemployment insurance compensation programs,
including benefits payments, claims administration, settlements, insurance
premiums, and legal fees. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next